Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB136.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 439.3103 is amended to read as follows:
(1) By December 1 of each year[, beginning in 2012,] the department shall submit to the Governor, the Legislative
Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on Judiciary[General Assembly], and the
Chief Justice a comprehensive report on its efforts to implement evidence-based practices to reduce
recidivism. The report shall include at a minimum:
(a) The percentage of supervised individuals being supervised in accordance with evidence-based practices;
(b) The percentage of state moneys expended by the department for programs that are evidence based, and
a list of all programs with identification of which are evidence based;
(c) Specification of supervision policies, procedures, programs, and practices that were created, modified,
or eliminated;[ and]
(d) The department's recommendations for resource allocation, and any additional collaboration with other
state, regional, or local public agencies, private entities, or faith-based and community organizations;
(e) A length of stay report on time served by first time incarcerated individuals released from the
department's custody, which shall include for each offense the:
1. Number of persons released;
2. Average sentence in days;
3. Average time served in days;
4. Average percentage of the sentence served;
5. Percentage of persons released on supervision; and
6. Number of persons released who were serving a life sentence or a life sentence without benefit
of probation or parole until he or she has served a minimum of twenty-five (25) years of his or
her sentence, and the average time served in days; and
(f) A report on persons released from the department's custody on supervision that shall include the
following:
1. Demographic information, including but not limited to:
a. Gender;
b. Race;
c. Age group at the time of release;
d. Parental status, and if the person is a parent, whether he or she has any form of custody
of his or her children; and
e. Gang affiliation;
2. Case information, including but not limited to:
a. Education level upon release;
b. The number of dependents upon release;
c. The crime of conviction;
d. Whether the person was sentenced on or after July 15, 2024; and
e. The number of days in custody prior to release;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
3. Count of:
a. Prior community supervision periods; and
b. Community supervision revocations;
4. Conditions of supervision, including but not limited to:
a. Mental health or substance abuse programming;
b. Cognitive skills or education programming; and
c. Any other condition of supervision;
5. Supervision activities, including but not limited to:
a. The number of technical violations;
b. The number of nontechnical violations;
c. The number of drug tests;
d. The percentage or number of positive drug tests;
e. The number of program completions while on supervision for which the offender
received good time credits and attendance has been verified;
f. The number of jobs per year while on parole and the percentage of days employed while
on parole; and
g. The number of residence changes to a new zip code during parole;
6. Prior criminal history, including the number of prior arrests and convictions; and
7. Rates of recidivism.
(2) The department shall:
(a) Collect all data necessary to prepare the report and may promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement this section; and
(b) Make the full report and an executive summary available to the general public on its website[Web site].
Section 2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Department of Corrections shall
procure a new inmate communications contract by January 1, 2026.
Section 3. Section 1 of this Act takes effect January 1, 2026.
Veto Overridden March 27, 2025.